Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, SB1387.
hereby enacts as follows:Section 1. Section 1327.2(a.1) and (c) of the act of March 10, 1949 (P.L.30, No.14), known as the Public School Code of 1949, amended November 12, 2025 (P.L.244, No.47), are amended to read:Section 1327.2. Attendance Policy at Charter, Regional Charter and Cyber Charter Schools.--* * *(a.1) In addition to the requirements of subsection (a), a cyber charter school shall include in its attendance policy the following:(1) A policy to determine when a child has an unexcused or 12345678910111213141516171819202122 excused absence or is present for synchronous instruction. To be present for synchronous instruction, a child must be present and visible to the teacher on camera [during each synchronous instructional period for each course].(2) A prohibition specifying that a cyber charter school administrator or chief administrator may not alter an attendance record taken by a teacher, unless the alteration corrects an error.(3) A policy to determine when a child has an unexcused or excused absence or is present for asynchronous instruction. To be present for asynchronous instruction, a child must complete [weekly] benchmarks. The following requirements shall apply to the [weekly] benchmarks:(i) A cyber charter school shall establish [weekly] benchmarks for students participating in asynchronous instruction. [and shall submit the weekly benchmarks to the department for approval by June 30 of each year for the following school year. If the department has not approved, denied or returned the weekly benchmarks within forty-five (45) days, the weekly benchmarks shall be deemed approved for the following school year.](ii) The [weekly] benchmarks must be sufficient to demonstrate the student is making adequate and consistent progress toward completion of each course in which the student is enrolled. The cyber charter school's attendance policy shall define adequate and consistent progress and include the [consequence] intervention for failure to make adequate and consistent progress.(iii) If a student does not complete the [weekly] benchmark, the student shall receive an absence or other [consequence] 20260SB1387PN1829 - 2 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 intervention in accordance with the policy under this paragraph.* * *(c) [(1)] Charter, regional charter and cyber charter schools shall report all unexcused absences directly to the department annually through the Pennsylvania Information Management System (PIMS).[(2) In addition to the reporting requirements under paragraph (1), cyber charter schools shall submit information related to the completion of the weekly benchmarks established under subsection (a.1)(3) annually through PIMS and the department shall post the information on the department's publicly accessible Internet website.(3) For students who have been found to be truant or habitually truant, cyber charter schools shall report the information required under paragraphs (1) and (2) directly to the department monthly through PIMS.]Section 2. Section 1329 of the act is amended by adding subsections to read:Section 1329. Excuses from Attending School.--* * *(b.1) A board of school directors of a school district may not create rules governing pupil attendance, absences and excusals that:(1) Assign an unexcused absence or unexcused tardy determination to students who are unable to attend school or delayed in attending school due to a lack of transportation provided by the local school district or a delayed transportation vehicle provided by the local school district.(2) Assign an unexcused absence or unexcused tardy determination to students who are unable to attend school or delayed in attending school due to a lack of common carriers or 20260SB1387PN1829 - 3 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 a delay in common carriers if the local board of school directors chooses to provide students with free transportation through common carriers, in accordance with section 1362.(3) Assign an unexcused absence to students as a result of accumulating a certain number of unexcused tardy determinations.(4) Assign an unexcused absence to students if they are tardy for a class or are absent from a class.(b.2) A board of school directors of a school district shall establish a process in which a determination made by a school employee to issue an unexcused absence or unexcused tardy to a student may be appealed to the school district superintendent, the local board of school directors or a neutral third party. The following procedures apply to the appeal process established by the board of school directors:(1) The school district shall, at a minimum, annually provide the appeal process to parents and guardians of students in the school district, which must be in writing and in the mode and language of communication preferred by the parent or guardian receiving the information.(2) The appeal process shall be posted on the publicly accessible Internet website of the school district.* * *Section 3. Section 1333(a) and (c.1) of the act, amended or added November 12, 2025 (P.L.244, No.47), are amended and the section is amended by adding subsections to read:Section 1333. Procedure When Child is Truant.--(a) When a child is truant, the school shall notify in writing the person in parental relation with the child who resides in the same household as the child of the child's violation of compulsory school attendance within ten (10) school days of the child's 20260SB1387PN1829 - 4 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 third unexcused absence. [The notice:(1) shall include a description of the consequences that will follow if the child becomes habitually truant;(2) shall be in the mode and language of communication preferred by the person in parental relation;(2.1) shall include notice to the person in parental relation that a child who is habitually truant may not transfer, during the school year, to a cyber charter school unless a judge determines that the transfer is in the best interest of the child;(2.2) shall include resources available to assist the child and the person in parental relation with returning the child to compliant compulsory school attendance and opportunities for further academic recovery in response to the truant behavior;(3) may include the offer of a school attendance improvement conference; or(4) when transmitted to a person who is not the biological or adoptive parent, shall also be provided to the child's biological or adoptive parent if the parent's mailing address is on file with the school and the parent is not precluded from receiving the information by court order.](a.1) The notice under subsection (a):(1) Shall include the following: (i) A description of the consequences that will follow if the child becomes habitually truant.(ii) Resources available to assist the child and the person in parental relation with returning the child to compliant compulsory school attendance and opportunities for further academic recovery in response to the truant behavior.(iii) A list of the unexcused absence dates.20260SB1387PN1829 - 5 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 (iv) Information about how a parent or guardian can appeal the school's determination of unexcused absence and truancy designation.(2) May include the offer of a school attendance improvement conference.(3) Shall be in the mode and language of communication preferred by the person in parental relation.(a.2) If the notice under subsection (a) is transmitted to a person who is not the biological or adoptive parent, the notice shall also be provided to the child's biological or adoptive parent if the parent's mailing address is on file with the school and the parent is not precluded from receiving the information by court order.* * *[(c.1) A child who is habitually truant may not transfer, during the school year, to a cyber charter school unless a judge determines that the transfer is in the best interest of the child.]* * *(e) A school district shall report all unexcused absences directly to the Department of Education annually through the Pennsylvania Information Management System (PIMS).Section 4. Section 1333.1(a) and (b) of the act are amended and the section is amended by adding subsections to read:Section 1333.1. Procedure by School When Child Habitually Truant.--(a) When a child is habitually truant and under fifteen (15) years of age at the time of referral, the school:(1) Shall refer the child to either of the following:(i) A school-based or community-based attendance improvement program.20260SB1387PN1829 - 6 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 (ii) The county children and youth agency for services or for possible disposition as a dependent child under the provisions of 42 Pa.C.S. Ch. 63 (relating to juvenile matters).(2) May file a citation in the office of the appropriate judge against the person in parental relation who resides in the same household as the child.(3) Shall notify in writing the person in parental relation with the child who resides in the same household as the child of the child's violation of compulsory school attendance within ten (10) school days of the child's sixth unexcused absence.(a.1) The notice under subsection (a)(3):(1) Shall include the following:(i) A list of the unexcused absence dates.(ii) Information about how a parent or guardian can appeal the school's determination of unexcused absence and habitual truancy designation.(2) Shall be in the mode and language of communication preferred by the person in parental relation.(b) When a child is habitually truant and fifteen (15) years of age or older at the time of referral, the school shall [either]:(1) Do either of the following:[(1)] (i) Refer the child to a school-based or community-based attendance improvement program or service.[(2)] (ii) File a citation in the office of the appropriate judge against the child or the person in parental relation who resides in the same household as the child.(2) Notify in writing the child and the person in parental relation with the child who resides in the same household as the child of the child's violation of compulsory school attendance 20260SB1387PN1829 - 7 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 within ten (10) school days of the child's sixth unexcused absence.(b.1) The notice under subsection (b)(2):(1) Shall include the following:(i) A list of the unexcused absence dates.(ii) Information about how a parent or guardian can appeal the school's determination of unexcused absence and habitual truancy designation.(2) Shall be in the mode and language of communication preferred by the child and the person in parental relation.* * *Section 5. Section 1333.3(i) of the act, added November 12, 2025 (P.L.244, No.47), is amended to read:Section 1333.3. Penalties for Violating Compulsory School Attendance Requirements.--* * *[(i) At the time of conviction of a child for a violation of the requirements of compulsory school attendance under this article, the court shall make a determination on the ability of the child to transfer to a cyber charter school in accordance with section 1333(c.1).]* * *Section 6. This act shall take effect in 30 days.20260SB1387PN1829 - 8 - 12345678910111213141516171819202122